Alaska, session 34, HB202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 44.09 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Sec. 44.09.055. State vegetable. The O-S Cross cabbage (Brassica oleracea 06 var. capitata), commonly known as "giant green cabbage," is the official vegetable of 07 the state. 08 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.